Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB421.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 44.1. Disclosure of complaints filed against physicians.A physician shall not be required to disclose a complaint filed against the physician with the board to any person or entity if all of the following apply:(1) The board determines that no disciplinary or 123456789101112131415161718192021 corrective action against the physician is necessary.(2) The complaint file is closed without any disciplinary or corrective action against the physician.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0421PN0355 - 2 - 1234